src-fst-stems-abbreviations.lexc.md
# File containing abbreviations 

## Lexica for adding tags and periods

Splitting in 4 + 1  groups, because of the preprocessor

* **LEXICON Abbreviation   **
1. The ITRAB ;	    lexicon (intransitive abbrs)
1. The TRNUMAB ;   lexicon (abbrs trans wrt. numberals)

## The sublexica
### Dividing between abbreviations with and witout final period

* **LEXICON ab-noun   **

* **LEXICON ab-adv   **

### The lexicons that add tags

* **LEXICON ab-nodot-noun   **  The bulk

* **LEXICON ab-dot-noun   **  This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.

* **LEXICON ab-nodot-adv   **

* **LEXICON ab-dot-adv   **  This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.

* **LEXICON ab-dot-adj   **  This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.



## The abbreviation lexicon itself


* **LEXICON SYMBOLS   ** is for iscellaneous abbr symbols



* **LEXICON ITRAB   ** are intransitive abbreviations, Ltd. etc.








* **LEXICON TRNUMAB   ** contains abbreviations who are transitive in front of numerals 

For abbrs for which numerals are complements, but other
words not necessarily are. This group treats arabic numerals as
if it were transitive but letters as if it were intransitive.







* **LEXICON TRAB   ** contains transitive abbreviations

This lexicon is for abbrs that always have a constituent following it.















* * *
<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [../src/fst/stems/abbreviations.lexc](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-hdn/blob/main/../src/fst/stems/abbreviations.lexc)</small>
